Maine, session 132, LD2077.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4722, sub-§1, ¶GG, as amended by PL 2021, c. 322, §2, is
further amended to read:
GG. In accordance with the credit for affordable housing established in Title 36,
section 5219‑WW and in accordance with rules adopted under the Maine
Administrative Procedure Act:
(1) Allocate the credit;
(2) Administer and enforce the requirements of the credit; and
(3) Perform other functions and duties necessary for the proper administration of
the credit, including providing any necessary certifications and notices to taxpayers
and to the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of
Revenue Services containing information required by the State Tax Assessor
necessary for determining eligibility and the amount of the credit for each taxable
year; and.
Rules adopted under this paragraph are routine technical rules.;
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §4722, sub-§1, ¶HH, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 322, §3, is
amended to read:
HH. Provide the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
housing matters copies of any reports required to be submitted to the United States
Department of the Treasury or the Governor regarding the administration of the
emergency rental assistance programs established by Section 501 of Division N of the
federal Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 and Section 3201(a) of the federal
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021. Copies of any reports required to be submitted to
the United States Department of the Treasury or the Governor must be submitted to the
joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over housing matters
no later than 7 days after the reports are submitted to the United States Department of
the Treasury or the Governor. If no such reports are required to be submitted to the
United States Department of the Treasury or the Governor, the Maine State Housing
Authority shall submit, beginning January 15, 2022 and annually thereafter, to the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over housing matters a report
on any rental assistance distributed by the Maine State Housing Authority.; and
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §4722, sub-§1, ¶II is enacted to read:
II. Administer a program that provides a grant of up to $15,000 per home purchase for
the purpose of reducing the mortgage rate of a loan for the purchase of an owner-
occupied single-family residence by a person whose income at the time of the grant is
no greater than the income limits for qualified first-time home buyers established under
26 United States Code, Section 143. The Maine State Housing Authority may use funds
appropriated or allocated to the Maine State Housing Authority for a grant issued
pursuant to this paragraph.
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§2, ¶BBB is enacted to read:
BBB. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, to the extent included
in federal adjusted gross income and to the extent otherwise subject to state income
Page 1 - 132LR2884(01)

413 tax, an amount equal to payments made to purchase private mortgage insurance for the
424 taxpayer's primary residence located in this State. As used in this paragraph, "private
435 mortgage insurance" has the same meaning as in Title 9-A, section 9-315, subsection
446 1, paragraph A.